apertium-mos.mos.dix
	<pardef n="gãneg/e__vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dame</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="mag/e__vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dame</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="pam/e__vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dame</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="wã__vblex">
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>adẽ</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dame</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>eme</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>eme</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="lʋɩ__vblex">
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>tẽ</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>tame</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ta</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>m</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>me</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>me</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="dat/e__vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>tẽ</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="tar/e__vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>ẽ</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="ko__vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>tẽ</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>s-y</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>sdame</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>sda</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>sa</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>same</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>same</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="gũ__vblex">
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>udẽ</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>u-y</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dame</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>me</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>me</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="mobg/e__vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e_<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e_<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>e_<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>e_<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dame</l>      <r>e_<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>e_<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e_<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e_<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e_<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="pids/i__vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dame</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<e lm="pame">             <i>pam</i><par n="pam/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="wã">              <i>wã</i><par n="wã__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="lʋɩ">             <i>lʋɩ</i><par n="lʋɩ__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="date">             <i>dat</i><par n="dat/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="tare">             <i>tar</i><par n="tar/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="ko">              <i>ko</i><par n="ko__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="gũ">              <i>gũ</i><par n="gũ__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="mobge">            <i>mobg</i><par n="mobg/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="pidsi">            <i>pids</i><par n="pids/i__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="pame">             <i>pam</i><par n="pam/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="wã">              <i>wã</i><par n="wã__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="lʋɩ">             <i>lʋɩ</i><par n="lʋɩ__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="date">             <i>dat</i><par n="dat/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="tare">             <i>tar</i><par n="tar/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="ko">              <i>ko</i><par n="ko__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="gũ">              <i>gũ</i><par n="gũ__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="mobge">            <i>mobg</i><par n="mobg/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="pidsi">            <i>pids</i><par n="pids/i__vblex"/></e>
